South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3872.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Hunting Heritage Protection Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 1, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-1-320.  (A) As used in this section: (1) "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources. (2) "Department-managed lands" means those lands owned by this State which the department holds management authority, those privately owned lands that are leased or managed by the department, and those lands managed by the State Forestry Commission and enrolled in the department's Wildlife Management Area program. (3) "Hunting" means the lawful taking of game as allowed in this title. (B) Department-managed lands must be open to access and use for hunting except as limited by the department for reasons of fish or wildlife management, or as otherwise limited by statute outside of the authority of the department. (C) The department, in exercising its authority under this title, must exercise its authority consistent with subsection (B), in a manner that supports, promotes, and enhances hunting opportunities to the extent authorized by law. (D) Department land management decisions and actions, including decision made by private owners to close land managed by the department, must not result in any net loss of habitat land acreage available for hunting opportunities on department-managed lands that exist as of January 1, 2026. The department must expeditiously find replacement acreage for hunting to compensate for closures of any existing hunting land. (E) By July first of each year, the director of the department must submit to the Senate Fish, Game and Forestry Committee and the House Agricultural, Natural Resources and Environmental Affairs Committee a written report describing: (1) the acreage managed by the department that was closed to hunting during the previous fiscal year and the reasons for the closures; and (2) the acreage managed by the department that was opened to hunting to compensate for closures of existing land pursuant to subsection (D). (3) The first report under this subsection is due no later than July 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----